Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-536
Directors; oath.

Each director before entering upon his or her official duties shall take and subscribe to an oath before an officer authorized to administer oaths, that he or she will support the Constitutions of the United States and the State of Nebraska, will honestly, faithfully, and impartially perform the duties of his or her office and will not be interested directly or indirectly in any contract let by the district. The oath shall be filed with the Chief Water Officer in the original case.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 10(1), p. 534;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 166.